Washington statutes.
RCW 39.59.020

Authorized investments—Local government authority.

(1) Local governments in the state of Washington are authorized to invest their funds and money in their custody or possession, eligible for investment, in investments authorized by this chapter.

(2) Nothing in this section is intended to limit or otherwise restrict a local government from investing in additional authorized investments if that local government has specific authority to do so.

[ 2016 c 152 s 10; 1988 c 281 s 2.]